Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 9. Termination of Guardianship

§ 3001.
Removal; resignation; marriage of guardian; vacancies.

If a guardian for a minor neglects to render an account as required by the Vermont Rules of Probate Procedure or to appear, or to perform an order or decree of the Probate Division of the Superior Court, or absconds or becomes mentally disabled or otherwise incapable or unsuitable to discharge the trust, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may remove or may allow the guardian to resign. Marriage shall not extinguish a guardian’s authority.
When a guardianship becomes vacant, the court may make a new appointment.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 14;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 150;

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 3002.
Minor ward’s marriage; exception.

The marriage of a minor under guardianship shall discharge the guardian from all right to custody and education, but not from a right to property of the ward.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 151;

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 3003.
Parent may move for guardian’s removal; notice.

When, by reason of the incapacity or unsuitableness of a parent to have the custody and education of a minor child, another person has been appointed guardian of the minor, the parent may, at any time, file a motion for the removal of the guardian. The court shall schedule a hearing and notice shall be given as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 152;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 64.

§ 3004.
Court may revoke.

Upon hearing, if the Probate Division of the Superior Court is of the opinion that the parent is then a proper person to have the care and custody of the child, it shall revoke the guardianship and order the guardian to deliver the custody of the child to the parent within a time it judges reasonable.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 153;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 3005.
Guardian refusing to give up ward, committed.

If the guardian does not obey the order, the court may issue a warrant directed to any sheriff or constable requiring him or her to apprehend and commit the guardian to the Commissioner of Corrections until he or she performs the order or is discharged by law.

§ 3006.
Repealed.
1979, No. 76, § 20.

§ 3007.
Repealed. 2005, No. 174 (Adj. Sess.), § 140(3).

§§ 3008-3010.
Repealed.
1979, No. 76, § 20.

§ 3011.
Special fiduciary.

When a guardian fails to perform duties required by law, the Rules of Probate Procedure, or order of the court, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may suspend the guardian from further duties and appoint a special fiduciary to assume temporarily the powers and duties of the guardian replaced.
A special fiduciary shall give a bond as is otherwise required in the proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 155; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.